test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-puttal_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - puttâl: # C stems Morottaja ja Olthuis
    puttâl+N+Ess: puttâlin
    puttâl+N+Par: puttâlid
    puttâl+N+Sg+Nom: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Gen: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Acc: puttâl
    puttâl+N+Sg+Ill: puttâlân
    puttâl+N+Sg+Loc: puttâlist
    puttâl+N+Sg+Com: puttâláin
    puttâl+N+Sg+Abe: puttâlttáá
    puttâl+N+Pl+Nom: puttâleh
    puttâl+N+Pl+Gen: puttâlij
    puttâl+N+Pl+Acc: puttâlijd
    puttâl+N+Pl+Ill: puttâláid
    puttâl+N+Pl+Loc: puttâlijn
    puttâl+N+Pl+Com: puttâlijguin
    puttâl+N+Pl+Abe: puttâlijttáá
